Washington statutes.
RCW 36.110.140

Education and training.

To the extent possible, jail industries programs shall be augmented by education and training to improve worker literacy and employability skills. Such education and training may include, but is not limited to, basic adult education, work towards earning a high school equivalency certificate as provided in RCW 28B.50.536, vocational and preemployment work maturity skills training, and apprenticeship classes.

[ 2013 c 39 s 18; 1993 c 285 s 14.]